Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4372.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "senior citizens principal residence specific tax act". Sec. 2. As used in this act: (a) "Commission" means the state tax commission created by 1927 PA 360, MCL 209.101 to 209.107. (b) "Principal residence" means that term as defined in section 7dd of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.7dd. (c) "Senior citizen" means an individual who owns and occupies a principal residence in this state and is at least 65 years old. (d) "Taxable value" means the taxable value as determined under section 27a of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.27a. Sec. 3. For taxes levied after December 31, 2025, property owned and occupied as a principal residence by a senior citizen is exempt from ad valorem property taxes collected under the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.1 to 211.155, as provided in section 7yy of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.7yy. Sec. 4. The assessor of each local tax collecting unit in which there is property subject to the exemption described in section 3 shall determine annually as of December 31 the value and taxable value of that property. Sec. 5. (1) There is levied on property subject to the exemption described in section 3 a specific tax to be known as the senior citizens principal residence specific tax. (2) The amount of the senior citizens principal residence specific tax in each year is equal to 50% of the amount determined by multiplying the property's taxable value by the number of mills that would be assessed in the local tax collecting unit if the property were subject to the collection of taxes under the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.1 to 211.155, and if the property was exempt as provided under section 7cc of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.7cc. (3) The senior citizens principal residence specific tax is an annual tax, payable at the same times, in the same installments, and to the same collecting officer or officers as taxes collected under the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.1 to 211.155. (4) The collecting officer or officers shall disburse the senior citizens principal residence specific tax to and among this state and cities, townships, villages, school districts, counties, or other taxing units, at the same times and in the same proportions as required by law for the disbursement of taxes collected under the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.1 to 211.155. (5) The collecting officer or officers shall send a copy of the amount of disbursement made to each taxing unit under this section to the commission on a form provided by the commission. Sec. 6. Unpaid senior citizens principal residence specific taxes are subject to forfeiture, foreclosure, and sale in the same manner and at the same time as taxes returned as delinquent under the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.1 to 211.155. Enacting section 1. This act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 4379 (request no. H01185'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.